test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ciaha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - čiähá: # á-stems
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom: čiähá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen: čiävá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill: čiähán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc: čiävást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com: čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Ess: čiähhán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähhád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom: čiäváh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: čiävái
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc: čiäváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill: čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc: čiäváin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com: čiä'váiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe: čiä'váittáá
